hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX v N 52
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]бу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ву sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]гу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ду sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]жу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]зу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ку sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]қу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]лу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]му sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ну sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]һу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]пу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ру sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]су sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ту sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]фу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]ху sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]цу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]чу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]шу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у асыздар [аоуұыэ]щу sf:асыздар:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у есіздер [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:есіздер:1
SFX v у йсіздер [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йсіздер:1
SFX v у йсыздар [аоуұыэ]у sf:йсыздар:1
SFX v ю йесіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йесіздер:1
SFX v ю йасыздар [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йасыздар:1
SFX W N 52
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]му sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]су sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ады:1
SFX W у ады [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ады:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:еді:1
SFX W у еді [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:еді:1
SFX W у йді [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йді:1
SFX W у йды [аоуұыэ]у sf:йды:1
SFX W ю йеді [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йеді:1
SFX W ю йады [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йады:1
SFX w N 52
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]бу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ву sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]гу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ду sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]жу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]зу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ку sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]қу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]лу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]му sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ну sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]һу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]пу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ру sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]су sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ту sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]фу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]ху sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]цу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]чу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]шу sf:айын:1
SFX w у айын [аоуұыэ]щу sf:айын:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у ейін [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:ейін:1
SFX w у йін [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йін:1
SFX w у йын [аоуұыэ]у sf:йын:1
SFX w ю йеін [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йеін:1
SFX w ю йаын [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йаын:1
SFX X N 52
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]бу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ву sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]гу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ду sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]жу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]зу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ку sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]қу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]лу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]му sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ну sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]һу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]пу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ру sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]су sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ту sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]фу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ху sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]цу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]чу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]шу sf:айық:1
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]щу sf:айық:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:ейік:1
SFX X у йік [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:йік:1
SFX X у йық [аоуұыэ]у sf:йық:1
SFX X ю йеік [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йеік:1
SFX X ю йаық [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йаық:1
