hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
азу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
айқасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
араластыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аттестациялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ауыттыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аяқтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аңсау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
байыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
барлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баттасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бақандау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
беймәлімдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бесеулеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бойшаңдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бортылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бунақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бырсылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бірдейлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүлкектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұраңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бәлдену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бөтендеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дайындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дақпырттау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
добалдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дыңғырлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дәмету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
езілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
елілеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ермектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ешкіқоңырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жайлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жалдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жарақатану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жақынсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жолығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жібу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
заулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ирелеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кезу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
керту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кредиттеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күлбіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көбейту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
майпаңдату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
марапаттасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мақаупестеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мерездеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
монтаждалу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
міреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мәжнүндеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
обырлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
орақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
оқшырайту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
рафикациялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
салдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
секеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
советтендіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
суару/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сынақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сілею/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұлду/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тайсақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тармақталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
теңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
толғату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
торлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоқмейілсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
туысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыржаңдату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыққыштау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түгелдету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түйінделу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түрмелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түтіндету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұрлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұқымдандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төпету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
уылжыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шабыттану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шалысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шапшыттыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шатынасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шақшию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шелтиту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ширақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шошақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шыжғыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шұрқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ымдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
эвакуациялану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қабықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қайқию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қанжарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қариялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қасықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қауырсындану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қақшаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қиылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қойғылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қорлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қоқу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қырлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қысқару/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құлақтандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құрыштану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үкілену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үтіктету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұрлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
әлсіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өрескелдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
